Nebraska, session 109, LB1092.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB1092 LB1092
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 60-3,163.02, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025,
is amended to read:
60-3,163.02 The department shall issue the following types of
alternate license plates pursuant to this section and sections 60-3,104,
60-3,163, and 60-3,163.01:
(1) Arbor Day Plates. The department shall design such license
plates in consultation with the Nebraska Statewide Arboretum and a
nonprofit organization holding a certificate of exemption under section
501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code with a mission to inspire people
to plant, nurture, and celebrate trees. The design of such license plates
shall represent the history and importance of Arbor Day in Nebraska. The
designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Arbor Day
Plates is the Home of Arbor Day Plate Cash Fund . A person may apply for
Arbor Day Plates beginning on January 1, 2026;
(2) Back the Blue License Plates. The department shall design such
license plates in consultation with associations that represent personnel
of any law enforcement agency in Nebraska. The design of such license
plates shall represent support for law enforcement personnel. The
designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Back the Blue
License Plates is the Back the Blue Cash Fund. A person may apply for
Back the Blue License Plates beginning on January 1, 2027;
(3) (2) Breast Cancer Awareness Plates. The department shall design
such license plates to include a pink ribbon and the words "early
detection saves lives" along the bottom of the license plate. The
designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Breast Cancer
Awareness Plates is the University of Nebraska Medical Center for the
breast cancer navigator program;
(4) (3) Choose Life License Plates. The department shall design such
license plates to reflect support for the protection of Nebraska's
children. The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for
Choose Life License Plates is the Health and Human Services Cash Fund to
-2-

LB1092 LB1092
2026 2026
supplement federal funds available to the Department of Health and Human
Services for the Temporary Assistance for Needy Families program, 42
U.S.C. 601 et seq.;
(5) (4) Czech Heritage Plates. The department, in consultation with
the Czech Honorary Consul of Nebraska, shall design such license plates
to reflect Czech heritage in Nebraska. The designated recipient for
alternate license plate fees for Czech Heritage Plates is the Department
of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund;
(6) (5) Donate Life Plates. The department shall design such license
plates to reflect support for organ and tissue donation, registration as
a donor on the Donor Registry of Nebraska, and the federally designated
organ procurement organization for Nebraska. The designated recipient for
alternate license plate fees for Donate Life Plates is the Organ and
Tissue Donor Awareness and Education Fund;
(7) (6) Down Syndrome Awareness Plates. The department shall design
such license plates to include the words "Down syndrome awareness" inside
a heart-shaped yellow and blue ribbon. The designated recipient for
alternate license plate fees for Down Syndrome Awareness Plates is the
University of Nebraska Medical Center for the Down Syndrome Clinic;
(8) Iconic-Design License Plates. For such license plates:
(a) The designs of the license plates shall be inspired by license
plates that were previously issued by the State of Nebraska but have
since been retired.
(b)(i) The department shall design the following two types of
Iconic-Design License Plates:
(A) Iconic-Design Black-Background License Plates. The design of
such license plates shall be inspired by a license plate that used a
plain black background and only white characters; and
(B) Iconic-Design White-Background License Plates. The design of
such license plates shall be inspired by a license plate that used a
plain white background and only black characters.
-3-

LB1092 LB1092
2026 2026
(ii) The department may design the following two types of Iconic-
Design License Plates:
(A) Iconic-Design Option One License Plates. If the department
designs such license plates, the design of such license plates shall be
inspired by any license plate that was previously issued by the State of
Nebraska but has since been retired; and
(B) Iconic-Design Option Two License Plates. If the department
designs such license plates, the design of such license plates shall be
inspired by any license plate that was previously issued by the State of
Nebraska but has since been retired.
(c) Each application for initial issuance or renewal of alphanumeric
or personalized message Iconic-Design License Plates shall be accompanied
by a fee of one hundred dollars.
(d) The designated recipient for Iconic-Design License Plates is the
Developmental Disabilities Provider Capital and Equipment Maintenance
Cash Fund.
(e)(i) A person may apply for Iconic-Design Black-Background License
Plates or Iconic-Design White-Background License Plates beginning on
January 1, 2027.
(ii) A person may apply for Iconic-Design Option One License Plates
or Iconic-Design Option Two License Plates beginning on an implementation
date designated by the director for such type of license plate.
(9) (7) Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around Water Plates. The department
shall design such license plates to include a blue background with the
head of an otter surfacing above water surrounded by the words "Josh the
Otter-Be Safe Around Water". The designated recipient for alternate
license plate fees for Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around Water Plates is the
Josh the Otter-Be Safe Around Water Cash Fund;
(10) (8) Mountain Lion Conservation Plates. The department shall
design such license plates to reflect support for the conservation of the
mountain lion population. The designated recipient for alternate license
-4-

LB1092 LB1092
2026 2026
plate fees for Mountain Lion Conservation Plates is the Game and Parks
Commission Educational Fund;
(11) (9) Native American Cultural Awareness and History Plates. The
department, in consultation with the Commission on Indian Affairs, shall
design license plates that reflect the unique culture and history of
Native American tribes historically and currently located in Nebraska.
The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Native
American Cultural Awareness and History Plates is the Native American
Scholarship and Leadership Fund;
(12)(a) (10)(a) Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates. The department
shall design such license plates to (i) include the word "Cornhuskers" or
"Huskers" prominently in the design, (ii) use scarlet and cream colors in
the design or such other similar colors as the department determines to
best represent the official team colors of the University of Nebraska
Cornhuskers athletic programs and to provide suitable reflection and
contrast, (iii) use cream or a similar color for the background of the
design and scarlet or a similar color for the printing, and (iv) create a
design reflecting support for the University of Nebraska Cornhuskers
athletic programs in consultation with the University of Nebraska-Lincoln
Athletic Department.
(b) Alphanumeric Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates shall (i) be
consecutively numbered beginning with the number one and use numbers that
are a size that maximizes legibility, and (ii) not use a county
designation or any characters other than numbers on the spirit plates.
(c) Personalized message Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates shall be
issued subject to the same conditions specified for personalized message
license plates in subsection (2) of section 60-3,118. The characters used
shall consist only of letters, numerals, or a combination of letters and
numerals of the same size and design specified in section 60-3,100. A
maximum of seven characters may be used.
(d) Each application for initial issuance or renewal of Nebraska
-5-

LB1092 LB1092
2026 2026
Cornhusker Spirit Plates shall be accompanied by a fee of seventy
dollars. Fees collected pursuant to this subdivision shall be remitted to
the State Treasurer. The State Treasurer shall credit sixty percent of
the fee to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund and forty percent
of the fee to the designated recipient for alternate license plate fees.
(e) The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for
Nebraska Cornhusker Spirit Plates is the Highway Trust Fund;
(13) (11) Nebraska History Plates. The department shall design such
license plates in consultation with the Nebraska State Historical Society
to reflect the importance of historical preservation in Nebraska and the
value of our shared Nebraska history. The designated recipient for
alternate license plate fees for Nebraska History Plates is the Support
Nebraska History Cash Fund;
(14) (12) Pets for Vets Plates. The department shall design such
license plates to support veterans and companion or therapy pet animals.
The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Pets for
Vets Plates is the Pets for Vets Cash Fund;
(15) (13) Prostate Cancer Awareness Plates. The department shall
design such license plates to include a light blue ribbon and the words
"early detection saves lives" along the bottom of the license plate. The
designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Prostate Cancer
Awareness Plates is the University of Nebraska Medical Center for the
Nebraska Prostate Cancer Research Program;
(16) (14) Sammy's Superheroes license plates for childhood cancer
awareness. The department shall design such license plates to include a
blue handprint over a yellow ribbon and the words "childhood cancer
awareness". The designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for
Sammy's Superheroes license plates for childhood cancer awareness is the
University of Nebraska Medical Center for pediatric cancer research;
(17) (15) Support the Arts Plates. The department shall design such
license plates in consultation with the Nebraska Arts Council to reflect
-6-

LB1092 LB1092
2026 2026
support for the arts in Nebraska. The designated recipient for alternate
license plate fees for Support the Arts Plates is the Support the Arts
Cash Fund;
(18)(a) (16)(a) Support Our Troops Plates. The department shall
design such license plates to reflect support for troops from all
branches of the armed forces. The designated recipient for alternate
license plate fees for Support Our Troops Plates is the Veterans
Employment Program Fund.
(b)(i) Each application for initial issuance or renewal of
alphanumeric Support Our Troops Plates shall be accompanied by a fee of
five dollars. The State Treasurer shall credit five dollars of the fee to
the designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for Support Our
Troops Plates.
(ii) Each application for initial issuance or renewal of
personalized message Support Our Troops Plates shall be accompanied by a
fee of seventy dollars. Twenty-five percent of such fee shall be credited
to the Department of Motor Vehicles Cash Fund and seventy-five percent of
such fee shall be credited to the designated recipient for alternate
license plate fees for Support Our Troops Plates;
(19) (17) The Good Life Is Outside Plates. The department shall
design such license plates to reflect the importance of safe walking and
biking in Nebraska and the value of our recreational trails. The
designated recipient for alternate license plate fees for The Good Life
Is Outside Plates is the Game and Parks State Park Improvement and
Maintenance Fund for the purpose of trail improvement and maintenance;
and
(20) (18) Wildlife Conservation Plates. The department shall create
no more than three designs for such license plates to reflect support for
the conservation of Nebraska wildlife, including sandhill cranes, bighorn
sheep, and ornate box turtles. The designated recipient for alternate
license plate fees for Wildlife Conservation Plates is the Wildlife
-7-

LB1092 LB1092
2026 2026
Conservation Fund.
Sec. 2. (1) The Back the Blue Cash Fund is created and shall be
administered by the Nebraska State Patrol. The fund shall consist of
gifts, grants, bequests, money received from any public or private
source, money credited pursuant to section 60-3,163.02, and money
transferred to the fund by the Legislature.
(2) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act. Any interest
or realized capital gains from any such investment shall be credited to
the Back the Blue Cash Fund.
(3)(a) The fund shall only be used pursuant to this section.
(b) The Nebraska State Patrol may award grants from the fund
pursuant to section 3 of this act.
(c) The fund shall not be used for buying any equipment for or
paying any salary or cost for the Nebraska State Patrol.
Sec. 3. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Eligible purpose means:
(i) Providing support to any:
(A) Injured law enforcement personnel;
(B) Spouse of any injured or deceased law enforcement personnel; or
(C) Child of any injured or deceased law enforcement personnel if
such child is under the age of nineteen years old; or
(ii) Conducting any charitable activity that supports the residents
of this state; and
(b) Qualified applicant means any association that represents
personnel of any law enforcement agency in this state.
(2) A qualified applicant may apply to the Nebraska State Patrol for
a grant under this section. The Nebraska State Patrol shall prescribe the
form for the application.
(3) The Nebraska State Patrol may award a grant to any qualified
-8-

LB1092 LB1092
2026 2026
applicant who applies under this section for an eligible purpose.
(4) The State of Nebraska shall not require or request any recipient
of a grant awarded under this section to reimburse any money received
from such grant.
(5) No later than January 1, 2027, the Nebraska State Patrol shall
prescribe the form for grant applications under this section.
(6) The Nebraska State Patrol may adopt and promulgate rules and
regulations to carry out this section.
Sec. 4. (1) The Developmental Disabilities Provider Capital and
Equipment Maintenance Cash Fund is created and shall be administered by
the Department of Health and Human Services. The fund shall consist of
gifts, grants, bequests, money received from any public or private
source, money credited pursuant to section 60-3,163.02, and money
transferred to the fund by the Legislature.
(2) Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested
by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital
Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.
(3)(a) The fund shall only be used pursuant to this section.
(b) The Department of Health and Human Services may award grants
from the fund pursuant to section 5 of this act.
(c) The fund shall not be used for the general operation or
administration of the state's developmental disabilities program.
Sec. 5. (1) For purposes of this section:
(a) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;
(b) Eligible purpose means any upgrade, modernization, renovation,
maintenance, or new purchase of the following that are used by a provider
to provide any developmental disability service:
(i) The transportation fleet that is used to provide support to or
to transport any individual with a developmental disability;
(ii) Any physical infrastructure or safety feature, including any
feature that is used to reinforce any space that is used to provide any
-9-

LB1092 LB1092
2026 2026
developmental disability service, safety glass, any perimeter security
feature, and any other physical improvement that is meant to protect any
client or staff member of a provider;
(iii) Any technology or remote-support infrastructure that is used
to support or monitor any client, staff member, or facility
infrastructure of a provider. Such technology or remote-support
infrastructure includes any sensor, smart-home automation feature, and
broadband infrastructure; and
(iv) Any facility to increase capacity for clients or optimize space
that is available for clients or the provision of any developmental
disability service, including any facility floorplan efficiency
improvement and installation of any amenity or restroom; and
(c) Provider means any entity that is under contract with the
department to provide any specialized or assisted service under section
83-1217.
(2) A provider may apply to the department for a grant under this
section. The department shall prescribe the form for the application.
(3) The department may award a grant to any qualified applicant who
applies under this section for an eligible purpose.
(4) No later than January 1, 2027, the department shall prescribe
the form for grant applications under this section.
(5) The department may adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to
carry out this section.
Sec. 6. Original section 60-3,163.02, Revised Statutes Supplement,
2025, is repealed.
-10-